Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-206.01
Aquatic invasive species, defined.

Aquatic invasive
species means exotic or nonnative aquatic organisms listed in rules and regulations
of the commission which pose a significant threat to the aquatic resources,
water supplies, or water infrastructure of this state.

Laws 2012, LB391, § 3.